Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-35,104
Hospital authority; bonds; sale.

The bonds may be sold at public or private sale at such price or prices or such rate or rates, and at such premiums or at such discounts, as the authority shall determine.

Laws 1971, LB 54, § 31;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.104.